Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
ARTICLE 15 METROPOLITAN FOOTBALL STADIUM DISTRICT ACT
32-15-107. Authorizing election.

For purposes of complying with the provisions of section 20 (4) of article X of the state constitution and upon receipt of a notice from the secretary of state stating that a valid petition has been filed and verified and the adoption of a resolution by the board as set forth in section 32-15-106 (1)(f), the board may submit to the registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district, at the 1998 general election, the question of whether the district shall be authorized:

To levy and collect, for a period commencing after the termination of the sales tax levied and collected by the Denver metropolitan major league baseball stadium district pursuant to section 32-14-105 and continuing for a period not to extend beyond January 1, 2012, a uniform sales tax throughout the district at a rate not to exceed one-tenth of one percent upon every transaction or other incident with respect to which a sales tax is levied by the state, pursuant to the provisions of article 26 of title 39, C.R.S.; except that such sales tax shall be levied on purchases of machinery or machine tools that are otherwise exempt pursuant to section 39-26-709 (1), C.R.S., to the extent that such purchases are subject to the sales tax levied by the regional transportation district pursuant to section 29-2-105 (1)(d), C.R.S., to be held and distributed pursuant to the provisions of section 32-15-111; and

To levy and collect a tax upon admissions to a new stadium pursuant to section 32-15-110.5 for a period not to extend beyond January 1, 2012, and at a rate not to exceed ten percent upon every purchase of admission to such stadium, to be held and distributed pursuant to the provisions of section 32-15-111; and

To incur multiple-fiscal year financial obligations to be repaid from other multiple-fiscal year financial obligations of the district or the revenues collected by the district, or both, and to refund and refinance the bond anticipation notes and special obligation bonds authorized without further approval of the voters even if, in the case of refinancing or refunding of bond anticipation notes, such refinancing or refunding is at a higher interest rate.

The summary for such petition shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following statements:

That the district will levy and collect the sales tax specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) for a period of time commencing after the termination of the sales tax levied and collected by the Denver metropolitan major league baseball stadium district pursuant to section 32-14-105 and continuing for a period not to extend beyond January 1, 2012;

The month, day, and year on which the sales tax levied and collected by the Denver metropolitan major league baseball stadium district is projected to terminate and the month, day, and year on which the sales tax levied and collected by the metropolitan football stadium district is projected to commence; and

A statement that the maximum principal amount of moneys to be raised by the district for payment of costs of construction of the stadium through the issuance of multiple-fiscal year financial obligations is two hundred sixty-six million dollars.

The board may submit the question set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) to the registered electors of the district:

After being presented with a notice from the secretary of state stating that a valid petition requesting the submittal of the question that is signed by the registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district in an amount equal to at least five percent of the total number of votes cast within the geographical boundaries of the district for all candidates for the office of secretary of state at the previous general election has been filed and stating that the signatures on the petition have been verified in accordance with subsections (2) and (3) of this section; and

After the adoption of a resolution by the board as set forth in section 32-15-106 (1)(f).

Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (d), at the election, the question appearing on the ballot shall be determined as follows:

In the event that the board has determined that it is more cost effective and economically viable to renovate Mile High stadium than to build a new stadium, the question appearing on the ballot shall be as follows:

In the event that the board has determined that it is more cost effective and economically viable to build a new stadium than to renovate Mile High stadium, the question appearing on the ballot shall be as follows:

Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (d), the ballot title shall be a statement of the language included in the question set forth in sub-subparagraph (B) of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (d); except that the title shall substitute the words "THE METROPOLITAN FOOTBALL STADIUM DISTRICT DEBT SHALL BE INCREASED" for "SHALL THE METROPOLITAN FOOTBALL STADIUM DISTRICT DEBT BE INCREASED", shall substitute the words "DISTRICT TAXES SHALL BE INCREASED" for the words "SHALL DISTRICT TAXES BE INCREASED", and shall substitute the words "THE PROCEEDS OF SUCH DEBT AND TAXES AND ANY INVESTMENT INCOME THEREFROM AND ANY OTHER REVENUES OF THE DISTRICT SHALL BE" for the words "SHALL THE PROCEEDS OF SUCH DEBT AND TAXES AND ANY INVESTMENT INCOME THEREFROM AND ANY OTHER REVENUES OF THE DISTRICT BE", and the title shall end with a period instead of a question mark.

The ballot question specified in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (d) may be modified by the proponents of a petition or by the district to the extent necessary to conform to the legal requirements for ballot questions and titles.

If at any election a majority of the registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district voting on the question vote affirmatively on the question specified in paragraph (d) of this subsection (1), then the sales tax and the admissions tax shall be levied, collected, and distributed as provided for in this article.

The provisions of article 40 of title 1, C.R.S., regarding the following subject matter shall apply to petitions that may be submitted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section: Form requirements and approval; circulation of petitions; elector information and signatures on petitions; affidavits and requirements of circulators of petitions; and verification of signatures, including, but not limited to, cure of an insufficiency of signatures and protests regarding sufficiency statements and procedures for hearings or further appeals regarding such protests. The provisions of article 40 of title 1, C.R.S., regarding review and comment, the setting of a ballot title, including, but not limited to, the duties of the title board, rehearings and appeals, and the number of signatures required shall not apply to petitions that may be submitted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Any petition shall be filed with the secretary of state at least ninety days before the 1998 general election. Any petition shall be valid only for the 1998 general election. Notice of any question to be submitted to the registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district after verification of the signatures on any petition filed with the secretary of state and at which election such question shall be submitted shall be filed by the board in the office of the secretary of state prior to fifty-five days before such election.

For purposes of complying with the provisions of section 20 of article X of the state constitution and upon the adoption of a resolution by the board, the board may submit to the registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district, at a general election or at an election held on the first Tuesday in November of an odd-numbered year, the question of whether the district is authorized to collect and spend revenues in excess of the fiscal year spending limitation of the district.

If at any such election a majority of the registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district voting on the question vote affirmatively on the question of whether the district is authorized to collect and spend excess revenues, then the district shall collect and spend such revenues as provided for in this article.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section concerning the sales tax shall not be applicable if the authority of the district to levy and collect any sales tax approved by the registered electors has expired pursuant to the provisions of this article. The provisions of subsection (1) of this section concerning the admissions tax shall not be applicable if the authority of the district to levy and collect any admissions tax approved by the registered electors has expired pursuant to the provisions of this article.

Prior to the general election at which any question is to be submitted to the registered electors pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the board shall hold at least two public hearings in each of the counties included, in whole or in part, within the district.

No public moneys from the state, any city, town, city and county, or county shall be expended by the public entity or by any private entity or private person to advertise, promote, or purchase commercial promotion or advertisement to urge electors to vote in favor of or against any question submitted at an election pursuant to the provisions of this article.

Prior to submitting a question to the registered electors of the district pursuant to this section, the district shall enter into an agreement with the franchise requiring the franchise to pay for all costs of the district associated with the election at which the question is submitted to the voters pursuant to this section.

"SHALL THE METROPOLITAN FOOTBALL STADIUM DISTRICT TAXES BE INCREASED (

FIRST FULL FISCAL YEAR DOLLAR INCREASE

) ANNUALLY AND BY WHATEVER ADDITIONAL AMOUNTS ARE RAISED ANNUALLY THEREAFTER FROM THE LEVY AND COLLECTION BY THE DISTRICT OF A ONE-TENTH OF ONE PERCENT SALES AND USE TAX FOR A PERIOD NOT TO EXTEND BEYOND JANUARY 1, 2012, OR UPON PAYMENT OF THE SPECIAL OBLIGATION BONDS, WHICHEVER OCCURS EARLIER, COMMENCING AFTER THE TERMINATION OF THE SALES AND USE TAX LEVIED AND COLLECTED BY THE DENVER METROPOLITAN MAJOR LEAGUE BASEBALL STADIUM DISTRICT, WITH ALL OF THE PROCEEDS TO BE USED AND SPENT, ALONG WITH FUNDS FROM OTHER SOURCES INCLUDING THE PRIVATE SECTOR, FOR THE COSTS RELATING TO THE RENOVATION OF MILE HIGH STADIUM; AND SHALL THE METROPOLITAN FOOTBALL STADIUM DISTRICT BE AUTHORIZED TO ISSUE MULTIPLE-FISCAL YEAR FINANCIAL OBLIGATIONS PAYABLE FROM THE PROCEEDS OF SAID ONE-TENTH OF ONE PERCENT SALES AND USE TAX AND SAID FUNDS FROM OTHER SOURCES, WHICH AUTHORIZATION SHALL INCLUDE THE AUTHORITY TO REFUND SUCH MULTIPLE-FISCAL YEAR FINANCIAL OBLIGATIONS AND REFUNDING SPECIAL OBLIGATION BONDS WITHOUT ADDITIONAL VOTER APPROVAL?"

"SHALL THE METROPOLITAN FOOTBALL STADIUM DISTRICT DEBT BE INCREASED (

PRINCIPAL AMOUNT

), WITH A REPAYMENT COST OF (

MAXIMUM TOTAL DISTRICT COSTS

) AND SHALL DISTRICT TAXES BE INCREASED (

FIRST FULL FISCAL YEAR DOLLAR INCREASE

) ANNUALLY AND BY WHATEVER ADDITIONAL AMOUNTS ARE RAISED ANNUALLY THEREAFTER FROM THE LEVY AND COLLECTION BY THE DISTRICT OF [A (____) PERCENT ADMISSIONS TAX AND FROM THE LEVY AND COLLECTION OF] [THIS CLAUSE TO BE INSERTED IF DETERMINED TO BE APPROPRIATE BY THE DISTRICT] A ONE-TENTH OF ONE PERCENT SALES AND USE TAX WITH ALL OF THE PROCEEDS OF SUCH DEBT AND TAXES TO BE USED AND SPENT, TOGETHER WITH FUNDS FROM OTHER SOURCES INCLUDING THE PRIVATE SECTOR, FOR THE COSTS RELATING TO THE CONSTRUCTION OF A NEW FOOTBALL STADIUM TO BE LOCATED WITHIN THE DISTRICT SUBJECT TO THE FOLLOWING LIMITATIONS:
o THE SALES AND USE TAX SHALL COMMENCE AFTER THE TERMINATION OF THE SALES AND USE TAX LEVIED AND COLLECTED BY THE DENVER METROPOLITAN MAJOR LEAGUE BASEBALL STADIUM DISTRICT AND SHALL NOT EXTEND BEYOND JANUARY 1, 2012, OR THE PAYMENT IN FULL OF SUCH DEBT, WHICHEVER OCCURS EARLIER;
o [THE DEBT SHALL BE EVIDENCED BY NOTES, BONDS, OR CONTRACTS INCLUDING NOTES, BONDS, OR CONTRACTS TO REFUND OTHER NOTES, BONDS, OR CONTRACTS EVEN IF THE REFUNDING IS AT A HIGHER RATE OF INTEREST;] [THIS PARAGRAPH TO BE INSERTED IF DETERMINED TO BE APPROPRIATE BY THE DISTRICT]
o THE DEBT SHALL BE PAYABLE FROM THE PROCEEDS OF SUCH TAX, INVESTMENT INCOME, AND SUCH OTHER DISTRICT REVENUES AS THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS MAY PLEDGE FOR SUCH PAYMENT;
o THE DEBT SHALL HAVE SUCH TERMS AND CONDITIONS AS THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE DISTRICT MAY DETERMINE, INCLUDING PROVISIONS FOR REDEMPTION PRIOR TO MATURITY WITH OR WITHOUT PAYMENT OF THE PREMIUM;
o [THE ADMISSIONS TAX SHALL NOT EXTEND BEYOND JANUARY 1, 2012, OR THE PAYMENT IN FULL OF SUCH DEBT, WHICHEVER OCCURS EARLIER;] [THIS PARAGRAPH TO BE INSERTED IF DETERMINED TO BE APPROPRIATE BY THE DISTRICT]
AND SHALL THE PROCEEDS OF SUCH DEBT AND TAXES AND ANY INVESTMENT INCOME THEREFROM AND ANY OTHER REVENUES OF THE DISTRICT BE COLLECTED AND SPENT WITHOUT LIMITATION OR CONDITION, AS A VOTER-APPROVED REVENUE CHANGE UNDER SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE COLORADO CONSTITUTION OR ANY OTHER LAW?"

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1063, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 97:

(1)(d)(I) amended, p. 1494, § 4, effective June 3.

L. 98:

(1)(a), (1)(b)(III), (1)(d)(I)(B), (1)(d)(II), (1)(d)(III), (1)(d)(IV), (3), (5), and (6) amended and (8) added, p. 503, § 4, effective April 22.

L. 2004:

(1)(a)(I)(A) amended, p. 1043, § 11, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

The measure regarding the new football stadium contained in subsection (1)(d)(I)(B) was approved by the people at the general election held November 3, 1998, and the vote count was as follows:

FOR: :u1000 399,064

AGAINST: :u1000 303,327

32-15-108. Position of trust - conflicts of interest.

The position of director, employee, adviser, or agent of the district is declared to be a position of public trust, and, therefore, in order to ensure the confidence of the people of the state in the integrity of the district and the board, the directors, employees, advisers, and agents of the district shall be subject to this section. While serving as director, employee, adviser, or agent of the district, no person or any member of such person's family shall be interested directly or indirectly in any contract, subcontract, or transaction with the district or in the profits thereof.

For purposes of this section, "family" means a person's spouse, child, parent, or sibling.

No director, employee, adviser, or agent of the district shall accept employment with the franchise within one year after the director, employee, adviser, or agent of the district has terminated service with the district.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1066, § 1, effective May 23.

32-15-109. Records of board - audits - legislative oversight - powers and duties of state auditor.

All resolutions and orders shall be recorded and authenticated by the signature of the chairperson of the board and the secretary. Every legislative act of the board of a general or permanent nature shall be by resolution. The book of resolutions and orders shall be a public record. A record shall also be made of all other proceedings of the board, minutes of the meetings, certificates, contracts, bonds given by directors, employees, and any other agents of the district, and all corporate acts, and said record shall be a public record. The board shall keep an account of all moneys received by and disbursed on behalf of the district, and said account shall also be a public record. Any public record of the district shall be open for inspection by any registered elector of the district, by any official representative of the state, or by any official representative of any county, city and county, city, or town included, in whole or in part, within the district. All records shall be subject to audit as provided by part 6 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S., for political subdivisions.

In addition to the audit authorized in subsection (1) of this section, upon the affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the legislative audit committee created pursuant to section 2-3-101, C.R.S., it shall be the duty of the state auditor to conduct or cause to be conducted audits of the district.

In conducting an audit pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), the state auditor or the state auditor's designated representative shall have access at all times, except as otherwise provided in sections 39-1-116, 39-4-103, and 39-5-120, C.R.S., to all of the books, accounts, reports, including confidential reports, vouchers, or other records or information of the district. Nothing in this paragraph (b) shall be construed as authorizing or permitting the publication of information prohibited by law. Any director, employee, or agent who fails or who interferes in any way with such examination commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

In verifying any of the audits made, the state auditor shall have the right to ascertain the amounts on deposit in any bank or other depository belonging to the district. In addition, the state auditor shall have the right to audit said account or the books of any such bank or depository. No bank or other depository shall be liable for making available to the state auditor any of the information required pursuant to the provisions of this paragraph (c).

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1066, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2002:

(2)(a) amended, p. 867, § 6, effective August 7; (2)(b) amended, p. 1543, § 291, effective October 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (2)(b), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

32-15-110. Sales tax imposed - collection - administration of tax - discontinuance.

Upon the approval of the registered electors pursuant to the provisions of section 32-15-107, the board shall have the power to levy such uniform sales tax upon the adoption of a resolution for a period commencing after the termination of the sales tax levied and collected by the Denver metropolitan major league baseball stadium district pursuant to section 32-14-105 and continuing for a period not to extend beyond January 1, 2012, throughout the district created in section 32-15-104 upon every transaction or other incident with respect to which a sales tax is levied by the state, pursuant to the provisions of article 26 of title 39, C.R.S.; except that such sales tax shall not be levied on the sale of cigarettes and shall be levied on:

Purchases of machinery or machine tools that are otherwise exempt pursuant to section 39-26-709 (1), C.R.S., to the extent that such sales and purchases are subject to the sales tax levied by the regional transportation district pursuant to section 29-2-105 (1)(d), C.R.S.;

Sales of low-emitting motor vehicles, power sources, or parts used for converting such power sources as specified in section 39-26-719 (1), C.R.S.; and

Vending machine sales of food that are otherwise exempt pursuant to section 39-26-714 (2), C.R.S.

The collection, administration, and enforcement of the sales tax shall be performed by the executive director of the department of revenue in the same manner as that for the collection, administration, and enforcement of the state sales tax imposed pursuant to article 26 of title 39, C.R.S., including, without limitation, the retention by a vendor of the percentage of the amount remitted to cover the vendor's expense in the collection and remittance of the sales tax as provided in section 39-26-105, C.R.S. The executive director shall make monthly distributions of such sales tax collections to the district. The district shall pay the net incremental cost incurred by the department of revenue in the administration and collection of such sales tax.

A qualified purchaser may provide a direct payment permit number issued pursuant to section 39-26-103.5, C.R.S., to any vendor or retailer that is liable and responsible for collecting and remitting any sales tax levied on any sale made to the qualified purchaser pursuant to the provisions of this article. A vendor or retailer that has received in good faith from a qualified purchaser a direct payment permit number shall not be liable or responsible for collection and remittance of any sales tax imposed on such sale that is paid for directly from such qualified purchaser's funds and not the personal funds of any individual.

A qualified purchaser that provides a direct payment permit number to a vendor or retailer shall be liable and responsible for the amount of sales tax levied on any sale made to the qualified purchaser pursuant to the provisions of this article in the same manner as liability would be imposed on a qualified purchaser for state sales tax pursuant to section 39-26-105 (3), C.R.S.

If the board levies such uniform sales tax as authorized in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall transmit to the executive director of the department of revenue not later than five days after the adoption of the resolution imposing such sales tax a certified copy of said resolution, whereupon said executive director shall proceed to collect, administer, and enforce such sales tax pursuant to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section until January 1, 2012, unless the executive director of the department of revenue receives from the board notification of discontinuance of the levy of such sales tax pursuant to the provisions of subsection (4) of this section.

At such time, prior to January 1, 2012, that the board determines that the levy of the sales tax is no longer necessary for the purposes set forth in this article, the board shall transmit to the executive director of the department of revenue not later than five days after the adoption of the resolution discontinuing the levy of such sales tax a certified copy of said resolution, whereupon said executive director shall discontinue the collection of said sales tax on the January 1, April 1, July 1, or October 1 immediately following the adoption of said resolution, whichever occurs first. Upon the adoption of said resolution discontinuing the sales tax levy, the board shall have no further authority to levy such sales tax on and after the January 1, April 1, July 1, or October 1 immediately following the adoption of said resolution, as applicable.

In no case shall the sales tax authorized by this section be levied for a period of time longer than is necessary to generate revenues sufficient to pay the principal, interest, and prepayment premium, if any, on outstanding special obligation bonds issued by the board pursuant to the provisions of this article and for such other purposes specified in section 32-15-111. Unless ended earlier, such sales tax shall not continue beyond January 1, 2012.

Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the sales and use tax to be collected pursuant to this article shall not exceed an amount necessary to:

Pay up to two hundred sixty-six million dollars for the principal amount of special obligation bonds, plus interest and prepayment penalty, if any, for such bonds, plus an amount the net present value of which shall not exceed seventy-five million dollars, which net present value shall be calculated as of January 1, 2001, based on an eight percent discount rate; and

Provide coverage ratios for the bonds and the net present value amount as determined by the board to be most advantageous to the district and the taxpayers.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1067, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 98:

(6) added, p. 507, § 5, effective April 22.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 983, § 8, effective May 28; (1) amended, p. 1358, § 9, effective January 1, 2000; (2) amended, p. 16, § 10, effective January 1, 2000.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1043, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

IP(1) amended, (HB 09-1342), ch. 354, p. 1849, § 10, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1) by House Bill 99-1015 and House Bill 99-1271 were harmonized.

32-15-110.5. Admissions tax imposed - collection - discontinuance.

Upon the approval of the registered electors pursuant to the provisions of section 32-15-107, the board shall have the power to levy an admissions tax upon the adoption of a resolution for a period not to extend beyond January 1, 2012, upon every purchase of an admission to a new stadium constructed by the district pursuant to this article. The amount of the tax shall not exceed ten percent of the price of each admission. The board shall have the authority to determine whether to levy an admissions tax pursuant to this section, and nothing in this article shall be construed to require the district to levy such a tax.

Every vendor making a sale to a purchaser that is taxable under the provisions of this section is required at the time of making such sale to collect the tax imposed by this section from the purchaser. The tax to be collected as provided in this section shall be conspicuously, indelibly, and separately stated and charged from the sales price on the ticket or card evidencing the sale and shown separately from the sales price on any record made thereof at the time of the sale or at the time when evidence of the sale is first issued or employed by the vendor; except that, when added, such tax shall constitute a part of such purchase or charge and shall be a debt from the purchaser to the vendor until paid and shall be recoverable at law in the same manner as other debts. The tax shall be paid by the purchaser to the vendor who, as trustee for and on account of the district, shall be liable to the district for the collection and return thereof.

The district may prescribe forms and procedures in conformity with this section for the adding of the admissions tax to the purchase price of an admission, for the making of returns, for the ascertainment, assessment, and collection of the tax imposed pursuant to this section, and for the proper administration and enforcement thereof.

In no case shall the admissions tax authorized by this section be levied for a period of time longer than is necessary to generate revenues sufficient to pay the principal, interest, and prepayment premium, if any, on outstanding special obligation bonds issued by the board pursuant to the provisions of this article and for such other purposes specified in section 32-15-111. Unless ended earlier, such admissions tax shall not continue beyond January 1, 2012.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 507, § 6, effective April 22.

32-15-111. Sales tax and admissions tax revenues - use.

Sales tax revenues and admissions tax revenues levied and collected pursuant to the provisions of sections 32-15-110 and 32-15-110.5 shall be used by the board for the following purposes:

To pay the principal, interest, and prepayment premium, if any, on outstanding special obligation bonds issued by the board pursuant to the provisions of this article;

Upon the approval of the registered electors of the ballot question set forth in section 32-15-107 (1)(d)(I)(B), to acquire a site within the district that shall be suitable for construction of a stadium;

To plan, design, and renovate Mile High stadium or to plan, design, and construct a stadium and all facilities incidental thereto;

To reimburse the board for the day-to-day operating costs incurred in the administration of the district; however, such costs shall not exceed three-fourths of one percent of the amount of sales tax and admissions tax revenues collected annually;

To reimburse the board for any loans made to the board or any direct out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the board on and after May 23, 1996, for matters directly related to the duties of the board prior to the time that sales tax or admissions tax revenues were available for use by the board;

To reimburse the commission for expenses incurred on and after May 23, 1996, in the investigation, study, evaluation, and selection of a stadium site;

To reimburse the board for preconstruction planning of the design and renovation of Mile High stadium or the construction of a new stadium and for the hiring of professionals to assist in these and other related activities.

If sales tax revenues and admissions tax revenues levied and collected pursuant to the provisions of sections 32-15-110 and 32-15-110.5 and the operating revenues generated by the district are insufficient for all of the purposes set forth in subsection (1) of this section, the purpose set forth in paragraph (a) of said subsection (1) shall have first priority of such sales and admissions tax revenues.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1069, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 97:

(1)(b), (1)(c), and (1)(g) amended, p. 1496, § 5, effective June 3.

L. 98:

IP(1), (1)(d), (1)(e), and (2) amended, p. 508, § 7, effective April 22.

32-15-112. Operating revenues - use.

Any operating revenues generated by the district, including, but not limited to, lease payments, fees, rentals, rates, tolls, penalties, and charges for services, programs, or facilities furnished by the district, shall be used by the board for the following purposes:

To pay the principal, interest, and prepayment premium, if any, on outstanding special obligation bonds issued by the board pursuant to the provisions of this article;

To pay for the expenses incurred by the board in the general operation of the stadium;

To provide for the repair and maintenance of the stadium;

To provide for capital improvements to the stadium;

To provide the counties within the district and the city and county of Denver with a benefit from the revenues, other than sales tax revenues or admissions tax revenues, derived from the operation of the stadium during the period of time the district is collecting the sales tax.

If operating revenues and sales tax revenues are insufficient for all of the purposes set forth in subsection (1) of this section, the purpose set forth in paragraph (a) of said subsection (1) shall have first priority of such operating revenues if such operating revenues are pledged to secure the payment of the special obligation bonds.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1069, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 98:

(1)(e) amended, p. 508, § 8, effective April 22.

32-15-113. Issuance of special obligation bonds.

Upon the approval of the registered electors pursuant to the provisions of section 32-15-107, the district may borrow money in anticipation of the revenues generated from the operation of a stadium and sales tax revenues and from admissions tax revenues, if any, of the district and may issue special obligation bonds in the maximum principal amount of two hundred sixty-six million dollars to evidence the amount so borrowed.

Special obligation bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this section shall satisfy the terms, conditions, and requirements as set forth in any resolution adopted by the board authorizing the issuance of such special obligation bonds or in any trust indenture entered into between the board and any commercial bank or trust company having full trust powers that are not inconsistent with the provisions of this article. Such terms, conditions, and requirements may include, but are not limited to, the following:

The execution and delivery of such special obligation bonds by the district and the times of such execution and delivery;

The form and denominations of such special obligation bonds, including the terms and maturities;

Whether such special obligation bonds are subject to optional or mandatory redemption prior to maturity with or without a premium;

Whether such special obligation bonds are in fully registered form or bearer form registrable as to principal or interest, or both;

Whether such special obligation bonds may bear conversion privileges and, if so, such conversion privileges;

Whether such special obligation bonds are payable in installments and, if so, the times of such installment payments; however, the period of time during which such payments may be made shall not extend beyond January 1, 2012;

The place or places, within or without the state, at which such special obligation bonds may be paid;

The terms and timing of payment of interest and the interest rate or rates which such special obligation bonds bear per annum and that may be fixed or may vary according to index, procedure, formula, or such other method as determined by the district or its agents, without regard to any interest rate limitation specified by the laws of this state;

Whether such special obligation bonds are subject to purchase at the option of the holder or the district;

The manner of evidencing such special obligation bonds;

Whether such special obligations may be executed by the officers of the district, including the use of one or more facsimile signatures so long as at least one manual signature of an officer of the district, or of any agent authenticating the same, appears on the special obligations bonds; and

Whether such special obligation bonds are in the form of coupon bonds that have attached interest coupons bearing a manual or facsimile signature of an officer of the district.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1070, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 509, § 9, effective April 22.

32-15-114. Pledge of sales and admissions tax revenues and net operating revenues.

The payment of special obligation bonds may be secured by the specific pledge of sales tax revenues and admissions tax revenues of the district, operating revenues of the district, or moneys or assets of the district held in escrow, as the board, in its discretion, may determine. Operating revenues, sales tax revenues, admissions tax revenues, or moneys or assets held in escrow pledged for the payment of any special obligation bonds, as received by the district, shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge, without any physical delivery thereof, any filing, or further act, and the lien of such pledge and the obligation to perform the contractual provisions made in the authorizing resolution or other instrument relating thereto shall have priority over all other obligations and liabilities of the district, except as may be otherwise provided in this article or in such resolution or instrument, and subject to any prior pledges and liens previously created. The lien of such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all persons having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the district, regardless of whether such persons have notice thereof.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1071, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 509, § 10, effective April 22.

32-15-115. Payment, recital, and securities.

Special obligation bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this article and constituting special obligations shall recite in substance that the obligations and the interest thereon are payable solely from operating revenues of the district, sales tax revenues of the district, admissions tax revenues of the district, or moneys or assets of the district held in escrow, as the case may be, pledged to the payment thereof.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1072, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 509, § 11, effective April 22.

32-15-116. Incontestable recital in securities.

Any authorizing resolution, or other instrument relating thereto pursuant to the provisions of this article, may provide that each security therein designated shall recite that it is issued pursuant to the authority of this article. Such recital shall conclusively impart full compliance with all of the provisions of this article, and all securities issued containing such recital shall be incontestable for any cause whatsoever after their delivery for value.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1072, § 1, effective May 23.

32-15-117. Limitation upon payment.

The payment of special obligation bonds shall not be secured by any encumbrance, mortgage, or other pledge of property of the district, other than operating revenues, sales tax revenues, admissions tax revenues, or moneys or assets held in escrow. No property of the district, subject to this exception, shall be liable to be forfeited or taken in payment of the special obligation bonds.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1072, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 509, § 12, effective April 22.

32-15-118. Negotiability.

Subject to the payment provisions specifically provided in this article, any special obligation bonds shall be fully negotiable within the meaning of and for all the purposes of article 8 of title 4, C.R.S., except as the board may otherwise provide.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1072, § 1, effective May 23.

32-15-119. Sale of special obligation bonds.

Any special obligation bonds issued pursuant to this article shall be sold at public or private sale for not less than the principal amount thereof and accrued interest, or at the option of the board, below par, at a discount not exceeding seven percent of the principal amount thereof, but such special obligation bonds shall never be sold at a price such that the net effective interest rate exceeds the maximum net effective interest rate authorized.

No discount, except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, or commission shall be allowed or paid on or for any sale to any purchaser or bidder, directly or indirectly.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1072, § 1, effective May 23.

32-15-120. Contracts.

The board shall award contracts in excess of three thousand dollars on a fair and competitive basis for the renovation or construction of any works, facility, or project, or portion thereof, or for the performance or furnishing of any labor, material, personal or real property, services, or supplies.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1072, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1496, § 6, effective June 3.

32-15-121. Management agreement - operation of stadium.

Upon the approval of the registered electors pursuant to the provisions of section 32-15-107, the board shall negotiate and enter into one or more management agreements for the management and operation of the stadium upon such terms and conditions that the board deems reasonable and necessary. Such agreements shall be legally binding contracts between the district and management organizations that shall contain appropriate and reasonable provisions with respect to termination, default, and legal remedies.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1073, § 1, effective May 23.